en: Tetherballs
xx: Tetherballs
cs: Míčky na tetherball
da: Stangtennisbolde
de: Tetherball-Bälle
es: Pelotas para espirobol
fr: Balles de spiroballe
it: Palle da tetherball
ja: テザーボール
nl: Ballen voor tetherball
no: Baller til stangtennis
pl: Piłki do gry w piłkę na uwięzi
pt: Bolas de espirobol
ru: Мячи для тетербола
sv: Bollar för tetherball
tr: Teterbol Topları

en: Riding Scooters
xx: Riding Scooters
cs: Koloběžky a skútry
da: Løbehjul
de: Roller
es: Patinetes
fr: Trottinettes
it: Scooter
ja: キックスクーター
nl: Scooterrijden
no: Scooterkjøring
pl: Hulajnogi
pt: Motonetas
ru: Самокаты и скутеры для катания
sv: Skotrar
tr: Scooter Motorlar

en: Skateboarding
xx: Skateboarding
cs: Skateboardové vybavení
da: Skateboarding
de: Skateboarding
es: Skateboard
fr: Skateboarding
it: Skateboarding
ja: スケートボード用品
nl: Skateboarden
no: Skateboard
pl: Jazda na deskorolce
pt: Skateboarding
ru: Товары для скейтбординга
sv: Skateboardåkning
tr: Kaykay Tahtası

en: Skate Rails
xx: Skate Rails
cs: Skateboardové kladiny
da: Skaterails
de: Skate-Rails
es: Barandillas para skateboard
fr: Rails de skate
it: Corrimano per skateboard
ja: スケートボードレール
nl: Skaterelingen
no: Skateboard-rails
pl: Poręcze do jazdy na deskorolce
pt: Corrimão de skate
ru: Направляющие для скейта
sv: Skateboardrälsar
tr: Kaykay Rayları

en: Skate Ramps
xx: Skate Ramps
cs: Skateboardové rampy
da: Skateramper
de: Skate-Rampen
es: Rampas para skateboard
fr: Rampes de skate
it: Rampe per skateboard
ja: スケートボードランプ
nl: Skateschansen
no: Skateboard-ramper
pl: Rampy
pt: Rampas de skate
ru: Рампы для скейта
sv: Skateboardramper
tr: Kaykay Rampaları

en: Skateboard Parts
xx: Skateboard Parts
cs: Díly pro skateboardy
da: Skateboarddele
de: Skateboard-Teile
es: Piezas del monopatín
fr: Pièces de skateboard
it: Parti per skateboard
ja: スケートボードパーツ
nl: Skateboardonderdelen
no: Skateboard-deler
pl: Części do deskorolek
pt: Peças do skate
ru: Детали для скейтбордов
sv: Skateboarddelar
tr: Kaykay Parçaları

en: Skateboard Decks
xx: Skateboard Decks
cs: Skateboardová prkna
da: Skateboarddeck
de: Skateboard-Decks
es: Tablas de monopatín
fr: Planches de skateboard
it: Tavole per skateboard
ja: スケートボードデッキ
nl: Skateboarddecks
no: Skateboard-plater
pl: Decki do deskorolek
pt: Shapes de skates
ru: Доски для скейтбордов
sv: Skateboardbräden
tr: Kaykay Gövdeleri

en: Skateboard Small Parts
xx: Skateboard Small Parts
cs: Malé součástky pro skateboardy
da: Små dele til skateboard
de: Skateboard-Kleinteile
es: Piezas pequeñas para monopatines
fr: Petites pièces de skateboard
it: Minuteria per skateboard
ja: スケートボード用小型パーツ
nl: Kleine onderdelen voor skateboards
no: Mindre deler til skateboard
pl: Małe części do deskorolek
pt: Peças pequenas para skates
ru: Мелкие детали для скейтбордов
sv: Smådelar till skateboard
tr: Küçük Kaykay Parçaları

en: Skateboard Trucks
xx: Skateboard Trucks
cs: Skateboardové trucky
da: Skateboardtrucks
de: Skateboard-Achsen
es: Ejes del monopatín
fr: Essieux de skateboard
it: Attacchi per skateboard
ja: スケートボードトラック
nl: Skateboardtrucks
no: Skateboard-trucker
pl: Trucki do deskorolek
pt: Armação das rodas do skate
ru: Подвески для скейтбордов
sv: Skateboardtruckar
tr: Kaykay Aksları

en: Skateboard Wheels
xx: Skateboard Wheels
cs: Skateboardová kolečka
da: Skateboardhjul
de: Skateboard-Rollen
es: Ruedas del monopatín
fr: Roues de skateboard
it: Ruote per skateboard
ja: スケートボードホイール
nl: Skateboardwielen
no: Skateboard-hjul
pl: Koła do deskorolek
pt: Rodas do skate
ru: Колёса для скейтбордов
sv: Skateboardhjul
tr: Kaykay Tekerlekleri

en: Skateboarding Protective Gear
xx: Skateboarding Protective Gear
cs: Skateboardové ochranné pomůcky
da: Beskyttelsesudstyr til skateboarding
de: Skateboarding-Schutzausrüstung
es: Equipo protector para skateboard
fr: Équipement de protection de skateboard
it: Attrezzatura protettiva per skateboard
ja: スケートボード用プロテクター
nl: Beschermende uitrusting voor skateboarden
no: Beskyttelsesutstyr for skateboard
pl: Stroje ochronne dla deskorolkarzy
pt: Equipamento de proteção para skate
ru: Защитное снаряжение для скейтбордистов
sv: Skyddsutrustning för skateboard
tr: Kaykay Koruyucu Kıyafetleri

en: Skate Helmets
xx: Skate Helmets
cs: Skateboardové přilby
da: Skaterhjelme
de: Skate-Helme
es: Cascos para skateboard
fr: Casques de skateboard, casque de trottinette
it: Caschi per pattinaggio
ja: スケートボード用ヘルメット
nl: Skatehelmen
no: Skateboardhjelmer
pl: Kaski do jazdy na deskorolce
pt: Capacetes para skate
ru: Шлемы для скейтбординга
sv: Hjälmar för skateboardåkning
tr: Paten Kaskları

en: Skateboarding Gloves
xx: Skateboarding Gloves
cs: Skateboardové rukavice
da: Handsker til skateboarding
de: Skateboarding-Handschuhe
es: Guantes para skateboard
fr: Gants de skateboard
it: Guanti da skateboard
ja: スケートボード用グローブ
nl: Skateboardhandschoenen
no: Skateboardhansker
pl: Rękawice na deskorolkę
pt: Luvas para skate
ru: Перчатки для скейтбординга
sv: Skateboardhandskar
tr: Kayak Eldivenleri

en: Skateboarding Pads
xx: Skateboarding Pads
cs: Skateboardové chrániče
da: Beskyttelsespuder til skateboarding
de: Skateboarding-Protektoren
es: Protecciones para skateboard
fr: Genouillères et coudières de skateboard, Coudière, Genouillère
it: Protezioni per skateboard
ja: スケートボード用パッド
nl: Pads voor skateboarden
no: Benskinner til skateboardkjøring
pl: Ochraniacze dla deskorolkarzy
pt: Acessórios de proteção para skate
ru: Защитные накладки для скейтбординга
sv: Arm- och benskydd för skateboarding
tr: Kaykay Pedleri

en: Skateboards
xx: Skateboards
cs: Skateboardy
da: Skateboards
de: Skateboards
es: Monopatines
fr: Skateboards, Skateboard d'enfant (jouet)
it: Skateboard
ja: スケートボード
nl: Skateboards
no: Skateboard-brett
pl: Deskorolki
pt: Skates
ru: Скейтборды
sv: Skateboards
tr: Kaykaylar

en: Winter Sports & Activities
xx: Winter Sports & Activities
cs: Zimní sporty a aktivity
da: Vintersport og -aktiviteter
de: Wintersport & -Aktivitäten
es: Actividades y deportes de invierno
fr: Activités et sports d'hiver
it: Sport e attività invernali
ja: ウィンタースポーツ
nl: Wintersport en -activiteiten
no: Vintersport og -aktiviteter
pl: Sporty zimowe i rekreacja zimą
pt: Esportes e atividades de inverno
ru: Товары для зимних видов спорта и игр
sv: Vintersporter och -aktiviteter
tr: Kış Sporları ve Aktiviteleri

en: Avalanche Safety
xx: Avalanche Safety
cs: Bezpečnostní vybavení proti lavinám
da: Lavinesikkerhed
de: Lawinenschutz
es: Seguridad frente a avalanchas
fr: Sécurité anti-avalanche
it: Sistemi di sicurezza antivalanga
ja: 雪崩対策
nl: Lawineveiligheid
no: Sikkerhetsutstyr for snøskred
pl: Zabezpieczenia lawinowe
pt: Segurança contra avalanches
ru: Оборудование для спасательных работ при сходе лавин
sv: Lavinsäkerhet
tr: Çığ Güvenliği

en: Avalanche Probes
xx: Avalanche Probes
cs: Lavinové sondy
da: Lavinesonder
de: Lawinensonden
es: Análisis de avalanchas
fr: Sondes anti-avalanche
it: Sonde per valanghe
ja: ゾンデ棒
nl: Lawinesondes
no: Søkestenger for snøskred
pl: Sondy lawinowe
pt: Sondas de avalanche
ru: Лавинные зонды
sv: Lavinsökning
tr: Çığ Çubuğu

en: Avalanche Safety Airbags
xx: Avalanche Safety Airbags
cs: Lavinové batohy
da: Lavineairbags
de: Lawinenairbags
es: Airbags protectores frente a avalanchas
fr: Ballons gonflables d'avalanche
it: Airbag di sicurezza per valanghe
ja: 雪崩エアバッグ
nl: Lawineairbags
no: Luftputer for snøras
pl: Plecaki lawinowe
pt: Airbags de avalanche
ru: Лавинные подушки безопасности
sv: Lavinryggsäckar med airbag
tr: Çığ Hava Yastıkları

en: Skiing & Snowboarding
xx: Skiing & Snowboarding
cs: Lyžování a snowboarding
da: Ski og snowboard
de: Skisport & Snowboarden
es: Esquí y snowboard
fr: Ski et snowboard
it: Sci e snowboard
ja: スキー・スノーボード用品
nl: Skiën en snowboarden
no: Ski og snowboard
pl: Jazda na nartach i snowboardzie
pt: Esqui e snowboarding
ru: Товары для лыжного спорта и сноубординга
sv: Skid- och snowboardåkning
tr: Kayak ve Snowboard